Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256I.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin County and Tribe supplementary administrative rate. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 1 or any other law capping housing support payments to counties or Tribes, the commissioner of human services must determine a rate to be paid to counties and Tribes on top of any rates paid pursuant to this chapter based on the total yearly housing support payments to fund the following activities: new text end new text begin (1) establishing and maintaining housing support agreements with providers, including the establishment of contracting processes; new text end new text begin (2) overseeing and monitoring the quality of provider services; and new text end new text begin (3) determining eligibility and making payments to eligible providers. new text end new text begin (b) No later than February 27, 2026, the commissioner of human services must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services and housing on the rate established pursuant to this subdivision and the rate's methodology. If the commissioner of human services modifies the rate under this subdivision, the commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services and housing on the new rate and the rate's methodology by February 27 the following year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HOUSING SUPPORT ADMINISTRATIVE RATE.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for the county and Tribe housing support administrative rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 256I.05, subdivision 12. new text end